Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Article 2. Permits and Variances.

Sec. 02.25.060.
Permits for removal of nonconforming structures or trees.

Where advisable to facilitate the enforcement of zoning regulations adopted under this chapter, permits may be granted to establish or construct new structures and other uses and to replace existing structures and other uses or make substantial changes or substantial repairs. Before any nonconforming structure or tree may be replaced, substantially altered or repaired, rebuilt, allowed to grow higher, or replanted, a permit must be secured from the department authorizing the replacement, change or repair. A permit may not be granted allowing the structure or tree to be made higher or become a greater hazard to air navigation than it was when the applicable regulation was adopted. If the department determines that a nonconforming structure or tree is abandoned or more than 80 percent torn down, destroyed, deteriorated, or decayed, (1) a permit may not be granted allowing the structure or tree to exceed the applicable height limits or otherwise deviate from the zoning regulations; and (2) whether application is made for a permit under this section or not, the department may, by appropriate action, compel the owner of the nonconforming structure or tree, at the owner’s own expense, to lower, remove, reconstruct, or equip the object to conform to the regulations. If the owner of the nonconforming structure or tree neglects or refuses to comply with the order within 10 days after notice, the department may proceed to have the object lowered, removed, reconstructed, or equipped, and the cost and expense is a lien upon the object and the land on which it is located. Unless the account is paid within 90 days from the service of notice on the agent or owner of the object or land, the sum bears interest at the rate of eight percent a year until paid, and shall be collected by foreclosure in the manner provided for the foreclosure of mortgages.

History.

(§ 3(1) ch 12 SLA 1951)

Collateral references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d, Aviation, §§ 86, 87.

Sec. 02.25.070.
Variances.

A person desiring to erect a structure, or increase the height of a structure, or permit the growth of a tree, or otherwise to use the person’s property in violation of airport zoning regulations adopted under this chapter may apply to the department for a variance from the zoning regulations. Variances shall be allowed where a literal application or enforcement of the regulations would result in practical difficulty or unnecessary hardship and the relief granted would not be contrary to the public interest but would do substantial justice and would be in accordance with the spirit of the regulations and this chapter.

History.

(§ 3(2) ch 12 SLA 1951)

Sec. 02.25.080.
Obstruction marking and lighting. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]